Illinois, session 104th, HB3434.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5)7    Sec. 5-5. Medical services. The Illinois Department, by 8rule, shall determine the quantity and quality of and the rate 9of reimbursement for the medical assistance for which payment 10will be authorized, and the medical services to be provided, 11which may include all or part of the following: (1) inpatient 12hospital services; (2) outpatient hospital services; (3) other 13laboratory and X-ray services; (4) skilled nursing home 14services; (5) physicians' services whether furnished in the 15office, the patient's home, a hospital, a skilled nursing 16home, or elsewhere; (6) medical care, or any other type of 17remedial care furnished by licensed practitioners; (7) home 18health care services; (8) private duty nursing service; (9) 19clinic services; (10) dental services, including prevention 20and treatment of periodontal disease and dental caries disease 21for pregnant individuals, provided by an individual licensed 22to practice dentistry or dental surgery; for purposes of this 23item (10), "dental services" means diagnostic, preventive, or   HB3434- 2 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1corrective procedures provided by or under the supervision of 2a dentist in the practice of his or her profession; (11) 3physical therapy and related services; (12) prescribed drugs, 4dentures, and prosthetic devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by 5a physician skilled in the diseases of the eye, or by an 6optometrist, whichever the person may select; (13) other 7diagnostic, screening, preventive, and rehabilitative 8services, including to ensure that the individual's need for 9intervention or treatment of mental disorders or substance use 10disorders or co-occurring mental health and substance use 11disorders is determined using a uniform screening, assessment, 12and evaluation process inclusive of criteria, for children and 13adults; for purposes of this item (13), a uniform screening, 14assessment, and evaluation process refers to a process that 15includes an appropriate evaluation and, as warranted, a 16referral; "uniform" does not mean the use of a singular 17instrument, tool, or process that all must utilize; (14) 18transportation and such other expenses as may be necessary; 19(15) medical treatment of sexual assault survivors, as defined 20in Section 1a of the Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 21Treatment Act, for injuries sustained as a result of the 22sexual assault, including examinations and laboratory tests to 23discover evidence which may be used in criminal proceedings 24arising from the sexual assault; (16) the diagnosis and 25treatment of sickle cell anemia; (16.5) services performed by 26a chiropractic physician licensed under the Medical Practice   HB3434- 3 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1Act of 1987 and acting within the scope of his or her license, 2including, but not limited to, chiropractic manipulative 3treatment; and (17) any other medical care, and any other type 4of remedial care recognized under the laws of this State. The 5term "any other type of remedial care" shall include nursing 6care and nursing home service for persons who rely on 7treatment by spiritual means alone through prayer for healing. 8    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 9comprehensive tobacco use cessation program that includes 10purchasing prescription drugs or prescription medical devices 11approved by the Food and Drug Administration shall be covered 12under the medical assistance program under this Article for 13persons who are otherwise eligible for assistance under this 14Article. 15    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 16reproductive health care that is otherwise legal in Illinois 17shall be covered under the medical assistance program for 18persons who are otherwise eligible for medical assistance 19under this Article. 20    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, all 21tobacco cessation medications approved by the United States 22Food and Drug Administration and all individual and group 23tobacco cessation counseling services and telephone-based 24counseling services and tobacco cessation medications provided 25through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline shall be covered under 26the medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise   HB3434- 4 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1eligible for assistance under this Article. The Department 2shall comply with all federal requirements necessary to obtain 3federal financial participation, as specified in 42 CFR 4433.15(b)(7), for telephone-based counseling services provided 5through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline, including, but not 6limited to: (i) entering into a memorandum of understanding or 7interagency agreement with the Department of Public Health, as 8administrator of the Illinois Tobacco Quitline; and (ii) 9developing a cost allocation plan for Medicaid-allowable 10Illinois Tobacco Quitline services in accordance with 45 CFR 1195.507. The Department shall submit the memorandum of 12understanding or interagency agreement, the cost allocation 13plan, and all other necessary documentation to the Centers for 14Medicare and Medicaid Services for review and approval. 15Coverage under this paragraph shall be contingent upon federal 16approval.17    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 18Illinois Department may not require, as a condition of payment 19for any laboratory test authorized under this Article, that a 20physician's handwritten signature appear on the laboratory 21test order form. The Illinois Department may, however, impose 22other appropriate requirements regarding laboratory test order 23documentation. 24    Upon receipt of federal approval of an amendment to the 25Illinois Title XIX State Plan for this purpose, the Department 26shall authorize the Chicago Public Schools (CPS) to procure a   HB3434- 5 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1vendor or vendors to manufacture eyeglasses for individuals 2enrolled in a school within the CPS system. CPS shall ensure 3that its vendor or vendors are enrolled as providers in the 4medical assistance program and in any capitated Medicaid 5managed care entity (MCE) serving individuals enrolled in a 6school within the CPS system. Under any contract procured 7under this provision, the vendor or vendors must serve only 8individuals enrolled in a school within the CPS system. Claims 9for services provided by CPS's vendor or vendors to recipients 10of benefits in the medical assistance program under this Code, 11the Children's Health Insurance Program, or the Covering ALL 12KIDS Health Insurance Program shall be submitted to the 13Department or the MCE in which the individual is enrolled for 14payment and shall be reimbursed at the Department's or the 15MCE's established rates or rate methodologies for eyeglasses. 16    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department of Healthcare 17and Family Services may provide the following services to 18persons eligible for assistance under this Article who are 19participating in education, training or employment programs 20operated by the Department of Human Services as successor to 21the Department of Public Aid:22        (1) dental services provided by or under the 23    supervision of a dentist; and 24        (2) eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in 25    the diseases of the eye, or by an optometrist, whichever 26    the person may select.  HB3434- 6 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1    On and after July 1, 2018, the Department of Healthcare 2and Family Services shall provide dental services to any adult 3who is otherwise eligible for assistance under the medical 4assistance program. As used in this paragraph, "dental 5services" means diagnostic, preventative, restorative, or 6corrective procedures, including procedures and services for 7the prevention and treatment of periodontal disease and dental 8caries disease, provided by an individual who is licensed to 9practice dentistry or dental surgery or who is under the 10supervision of a dentist in the practice of his or her 11profession.12    On and after July 1, 2018, targeted dental services, as 13set forth in Exhibit D of the Consent Decree entered by the 14United States District Court for the Northern District of 15Illinois, Eastern Division, in the matter of Memisovski v. 16Maram, Case No. 92 C 1982, that are provided to adults under 17the medical assistance program shall be established at no less 18than the rates set forth in the "New Rate" column in Exhibit D 19of the Consent Decree for targeted dental services that are 20provided to persons under the age of 18 under the medical 21assistance program. 22    Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2025, 23the rates paid for sedation evaluation and the provision of 24deep sedation and intravenous sedation for the purpose of 25dental services shall be increased by 33% above the rates in 26effect on December 31, 2024. The rates paid for nitrous oxide   HB3434- 7 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1sedation shall not be impacted by this paragraph and shall 2remain the same as the rates in effect on December 31, 2024. 3    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code and 4subject to federal approval, the Department may adopt rules to 5allow a dentist who is volunteering his or her service at no 6cost to render dental services through an enrolled 7not-for-profit health clinic without the dentist personally 8enrolling as a participating provider in the medical 9assistance program. A not-for-profit health clinic shall 10include a public health clinic or Federally Qualified Health 11Center or other enrolled provider, as determined by the 12Department, through which dental services covered under this 13Section are performed. The Department shall establish a 14process for payment of claims for reimbursement for covered 15dental services rendered under this provision. 16    Subject to appropriation and to federal approval, the 17Department shall file administrative rules updating the 18Handicapping Labio-Lingual Deviation orthodontic scoring tool 19by January 1, 2025, or as soon as practicable. 20    On and after January 1, 2022, the Department of Healthcare 21and Family Services shall administer and regulate a 22school-based dental program that allows for the out-of-office 23delivery of preventative dental services in a school setting 24to children under 19 years of age. The Department shall 25establish, by rule, guidelines for participation by providers 26and set requirements for follow-up referral care based on the   HB3434- 8 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1requirements established in the Dental Office Reference Manual 2published by the Department that establishes the requirements 3for dentists participating in the All Kids Dental School 4Program. Every effort shall be made by the Department when 5developing the program requirements to consider the different 6geographic differences of both urban and rural areas of the 7State for initial treatment and necessary follow-up care. No 8provider shall be charged a fee by any unit of local government 9to participate in the school-based dental program administered 10by the Department. Nothing in this paragraph shall be 11construed to limit or preempt a home rule unit's or school 12district's authority to establish, change, or administer a 13school-based dental program in addition to, or independent of, 14the school-based dental program administered by the 15Department. 16    The Illinois Department, by rule, may distinguish and 17classify the medical services to be provided only in 18accordance with the classes of persons designated in Section 195-2. 20    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services must 21provide coverage and reimbursement for amino acid-based 22elemental formulas, regardless of delivery method, for the 23diagnosis and treatment of (i) eosinophilic disorders and (ii) 24short bowel syndrome when the prescribing physician has issued 25a written order stating that the amino acid-based elemental 26formula is medically necessary.   HB3434- 9 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1    The Illinois Department shall authorize the provision of, 2and shall authorize payment for, screening by low-dose 3mammography for the presence of occult breast cancer for 4individuals 35 years of age or older who are eligible for 5medical assistance under this Article, as follows:6        (A) A baseline mammogram for individuals 35 to 39 7    years of age. 8        (B) An annual mammogram for individuals 40 years of 9    age or older.10        (C) A mammogram at the age and intervals considered 11    medically necessary by the individual's health care 12    provider for individuals under 40 years of age and having 13    a family history of breast cancer, prior personal history 14    of breast cancer, positive genetic testing, or other risk 15    factors.16        (D) A comprehensive ultrasound screening and MRI of an 17    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 18    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 19    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 20    practice medicine in all of its branches. 21        (E) A screening MRI when medically necessary, as 22    determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine in 23    all of its branches. 24        (F) A diagnostic mammogram when medically necessary, 25    as determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine 26    in all its branches, advanced practice registered nurse,   HB3434- 10 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1    or physician assistant. 2        (G) Molecular breast imaging (MBI) and MRI of an 3    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 4    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 5    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 6    practice medicine in all of its branches, advanced 7    practice registered nurse, or physician assistant. 8    The Department shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, 9copayment, or any other cost-sharing requirement on the 10coverage provided under this paragraph; except that this 11sentence does not apply to coverage of diagnostic mammograms 12to the extent such coverage would disqualify a high-deductible 13health plan from eligibility for a health savings account 14pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 15U.S.C. 223). 16    All screenings shall include a physical breast exam, 17instruction on self-examination and information regarding the 18frequency of self-examination and its value as a preventative 19tool.20    For purposes of this Section:21    "Diagnostic mammogram" means a mammogram obtained using 22diagnostic mammography.23    "Diagnostic mammography" means a method of screening that 24is designed to evaluate an abnormality in a breast, including 25an abnormality seen or suspected on a screening mammogram or a 26subjective or objective abnormality otherwise detected in the   HB3434- 11 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1breast.2    "Low-dose mammography" means the x-ray examination of the 3breast using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 4including the x-ray tube, filter, compression device, and 5image receptor, with an average radiation exposure delivery of 6less than one rad per breast for 2 views of an average size 7breast. The term also includes digital mammography and 8includes breast tomosynthesis.9    "Breast tomosynthesis" means a radiologic procedure that 10involves the acquisition of projection images over the 11stationary breast to produce cross-sectional digital 12three-dimensional images of the breast.13    If, at any time, the Secretary of the United States 14Department of Health and Human Services, or its successor 15agency, promulgates rules or regulations to be published in 16the Federal Register or publishes a comment in the Federal 17Register or issues an opinion, guidance, or other action that 18would require the State, pursuant to any provision of the 19Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 20111-148), including, but not limited to, 42 U.S.C. 2118031(d)(3)(B) or any successor provision, to defray the cost 22of any coverage for breast tomosynthesis outlined in this 23paragraph, then the requirement that an insurer cover breast 24tomosynthesis is inoperative other than any such coverage 25authorized under Section 1902 of the Social Security Act, 42 26U.S.C. 1396a, and the State shall not assume any obligation   HB3434- 12 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1for the cost of coverage for breast tomosynthesis set forth in 2this paragraph.3    On and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall ensure 4that all networks of care for adult clients of the Department 5include access to at least one breast imaging Center of 6Imaging Excellence as certified by the American College of 7Radiology.8    On and after January 1, 2012, providers participating in a 9quality improvement program approved by the Department shall 10be reimbursed for screening and diagnostic mammography at the 11same rate as the Medicare program's rates, including the 12increased reimbursement for digital mammography and, after 13January 1, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1018), 14breast tomosynthesis.15    The Department shall convene an expert panel including 16representatives of hospitals, free-standing mammography 17facilities, and doctors, including radiologists, to establish 18quality standards for mammography.19    On and after January 1, 2017, providers participating in a 20breast cancer treatment quality improvement program approved 21by the Department shall be reimbursed for breast cancer 22treatment at a rate that is no lower than 95% of the Medicare 23program's rates for the data elements included in the breast 24cancer treatment quality program.25    The Department shall convene an expert panel, including 26representatives of hospitals, free-standing breast cancer   HB3434- 13 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1treatment centers, breast cancer quality organizations, and 2doctors, including radiologists that are trained in all forms 3of FDA-approved FDA approved breast imaging technologies, 4breast surgeons, reconstructive breast surgeons, oncologists, 5and primary care providers to establish quality standards for 6breast cancer treatment.7    Subject to federal approval, the Department shall 8establish a rate methodology for mammography at federally 9qualified health centers and other encounter-rate clinics. 10These clinics or centers may also collaborate with other 11hospital-based mammography facilities. By January 1, 2016, the 12Department shall report to the General Assembly on the status 13of the provision set forth in this paragraph.14    The Department shall establish a methodology to remind 15individuals who are age-appropriate for screening mammography, 16but who have not received a mammogram within the previous 18 17months, of the importance and benefit of screening 18mammography. The Department shall work with experts in breast 19cancer outreach and patient navigation to optimize these 20reminders and shall establish a methodology for evaluating 21their effectiveness and modifying the methodology based on the 22evaluation.23    The Department shall establish a performance goal for 24primary care providers with respect to their female patients 25over age 40 receiving an annual mammogram. This performance 26goal shall be used to provide additional reimbursement in the   HB3434- 14 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1form of a quality performance bonus to primary care providers 2who meet that goal.3    The Department shall devise a means of case-managing or 4patient navigation for beneficiaries diagnosed with breast 5cancer. This program shall initially operate as a pilot 6program in areas of the State with the highest incidence of 7mortality related to breast cancer. At least one pilot program 8site shall be in the metropolitan Chicago area and at least one 9site shall be outside the metropolitan Chicago area. On or 10after July 1, 2016, the pilot program shall be expanded to 11include one site in western Illinois, one site in southern 12Illinois, one site in central Illinois, and 4 sites within 13metropolitan Chicago. An evaluation of the pilot program shall 14be carried out measuring health outcomes and cost of care for 15those served by the pilot program compared to similarly 16situated patients who are not served by the pilot program. 17    The Department shall require all networks of care to 18develop a means either internally or by contract with experts 19in navigation and community outreach to navigate cancer 20patients to comprehensive care in a timely fashion. The 21Department shall require all networks of care to include 22access for patients diagnosed with cancer to at least one 23academic commission on cancer-accredited cancer program as an 24in-network covered benefit.25    The Department shall provide coverage and reimbursement 26for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine that is approved for   HB3434- 15 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration for all 2persons between the ages of 9 and 45. Subject to federal 3approval, the Department shall provide coverage and 4reimbursement for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine for 5persons of the age of 46 and above who have been diagnosed with 6cervical dysplasia with a high risk of recurrence or 7progression. The Department shall disallow any 8preauthorization requirements for the administration of the 9human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine. 10    On or after July 1, 2022, individuals who are otherwise 11eligible for medical assistance under this Article shall 12receive coverage for perinatal depression screenings for the 1312-month period beginning on the last day of their pregnancy. 14Medical assistance coverage under this paragraph shall be 15conditioned on the use of a screening instrument approved by 16the Department.17    Any medical or health care provider shall immediately 18recommend, to any pregnant individual who is being provided 19prenatal services and is suspected of having a substance use 20disorder as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 21referral to a local substance use disorder treatment program 22licensed by the Department of Human Services or to a licensed 23hospital which provides substance abuse treatment services. 24The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall assure 25coverage for the cost of treatment of the drug abuse or 26addiction for pregnant recipients in accordance with the   HB3434- 16 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1Illinois Medicaid Program in conjunction with the Department 2of Human Services. 3    All medical providers providing medical assistance to 4pregnant individuals under this Code shall receive information 5from the Department on the availability of services under any 6program providing case management services for addicted 7individuals, including information on appropriate referrals 8for other social services that may be needed by addicted 9individuals in addition to treatment for addiction. 10    The Illinois Department, in cooperation with the 11Departments of Human Services (as successor to the Department 12of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse) and Public Health, through 13a public awareness campaign, may provide information 14concerning treatment for alcoholism and drug abuse and 15addiction, prenatal health care, and other pertinent programs 16directed at reducing the number of drug-affected infants born 17to recipients of medical assistance. 18    Neither the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 19nor the Department of Human Services shall sanction the 20recipient solely on the basis of the recipient's substance 21abuse. 22    The Illinois Department shall establish such regulations 23governing the dispensing of health services under this Article 24as it shall deem appropriate. The Department should seek the 25advice of formal professional advisory committees appointed by 26the Director of the Illinois Department for the purpose of   HB3434- 17 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1providing regular advice on policy and administrative matters, 2information dissemination and educational activities for 3medical and health care providers, and consistency in 4procedures to the Illinois Department. 5    The Illinois Department may develop and contract with 6Partnerships of medical providers to arrange medical services 7for persons eligible under Section 5-2 of this Code. 8Implementation of this Section may be by demonstration 9projects in certain geographic areas. The Partnership shall be 10represented by a sponsor organization. The Department, by 11rule, shall develop qualifications for sponsors of 12Partnerships. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 13require that the sponsor organization be a medical 14organization. 15    The sponsor must negotiate formal written contracts with 16medical providers for physician services, inpatient and 17outpatient hospital care, home health services, treatment for 18alcoholism and substance abuse, and other services determined 19necessary by the Illinois Department by rule for delivery by 20Partnerships. Physician services must include prenatal and 21obstetrical care. The Illinois Department shall reimburse 22medical services delivered by Partnership providers to clients 23in target areas according to provisions of this Article and 24the Illinois Health Finance Reform Act, except that: 25        (1) Physicians participating in a Partnership and 26    providing certain services, which shall be determined by   HB3434- 18 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1    the Illinois Department, to persons in areas covered by 2    the Partnership may receive an additional surcharge for 3    such services. 4        (2) The Department may elect to consider and negotiate 5    financial incentives to encourage the development of 6    Partnerships and the efficient delivery of medical care. 7        (3) Persons receiving medical services through 8    Partnerships may receive medical and case management 9    services above the level usually offered through the 10    medical assistance program. 11    Medical providers shall be required to meet certain 12qualifications to participate in Partnerships to ensure the 13delivery of high quality medical services. These 14qualifications shall be determined by rule of the Illinois 15Department and may be higher than qualifications for 16participation in the medical assistance program. Partnership 17sponsors may prescribe reasonable additional qualifications 18for participation by medical providers, only with the prior 19written approval of the Illinois Department. 20    Nothing in this Section shall limit the free choice of 21practitioners, hospitals, and other providers of medical 22services by clients. In order to ensure patient freedom of 23choice, the Illinois Department shall immediately promulgate 24all rules and take all other necessary actions so that 25provided services may be accessed from therapeutically 26certified optometrists to the full extent of the Illinois   HB3434- 19 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1Optometric Practice Act of 1987 without discriminating between 2service providers. 3    The Department shall apply for a waiver from the United 4States Health Care Financing Administration to allow for the 5implementation of Partnerships under this Section. 6    The Illinois Department shall require health care 7providers to maintain records that document the medical care 8and services provided to recipients of Medical Assistance 9under this Article. Such records must be retained for a period 10of not less than 6 years from the date of service or as 11provided by applicable State law, whichever period is longer, 12except that if an audit is initiated within the required 13retention period then the records must be retained until the 14audit is completed and every exception is resolved. The 15Illinois Department shall require health care providers to 16make available, when authorized by the patient, in writing, 17the medical records in a timely fashion to other health care 18providers who are treating or serving persons eligible for 19Medical Assistance under this Article. All dispensers of 20medical services shall be required to maintain and retain 21business and professional records sufficient to fully and 22accurately document the nature, scope, details and receipt of 23the health care provided to persons eligible for medical 24assistance under this Code, in accordance with regulations 25promulgated by the Illinois Department. The rules and 26regulations shall require that proof of the receipt of   HB3434- 20 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1prescription drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and 2eyeglasses by eligible persons under this Section accompany 3each claim for reimbursement submitted by the dispenser of 4such medical services. No such claims for reimbursement shall 5be approved for payment by the Illinois Department without 6such proof of receipt, unless the Illinois Department shall 7have put into effect and shall be operating a system of 8post-payment audit and review which shall, on a sampling 9basis, be deemed adequate by the Illinois Department to assure 10that such drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and eyeglasses 11for which payment is being made are actually being received by 12eligible recipients. Within 90 days after September 16, 1984 13(the effective date of Public Act 83-1439), the Illinois 14Department shall establish a current list of acquisition costs 15for all prosthetic devices and any other items recognized as 16medical equipment and supplies reimbursable under this Article 17and shall update such list on a quarterly basis, except that 18the acquisition costs of all prescription drugs shall be 19updated no less frequently than every 30 days as required by 20Section 5-5.12. 21    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 22Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after July 22, 2013 23(the effective date of Public Act 98-104), establish 24procedures to permit skilled care facilities licensed under 25the Nursing Home Care Act to submit monthly billing claims for 26reimbursement purposes. Following development of these   HB3434- 21 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1procedures, the Department shall, by July 1, 2016, test the 2viability of the new system and implement any necessary 3operational or structural changes to its information 4technology platforms in order to allow for the direct 5acceptance and payment of nursing home claims. 6    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 7Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after August 15, 82014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-963), establish 9procedures to permit ID/DD facilities licensed under the ID/DD 10Community Care Act and MC/DD facilities licensed under the 11MC/DD Act to submit monthly billing claims for reimbursement 12purposes. Following development of these procedures, the 13Department shall have an additional 365 days to test the 14viability of the new system and to ensure that any necessary 15operational or structural changes to its information 16technology platforms are implemented. 17    The Illinois Department shall require all dispensers of 18medical services, other than an individual practitioner or 19group of practitioners, desiring to participate in the Medical 20Assistance program established under this Article to disclose 21all financial, beneficial, ownership, equity, surety or other 22interests in any and all firms, corporations, partnerships, 23associations, business enterprises, joint ventures, agencies, 24institutions or other legal entities providing any form of 25health care services in this State under this Article. 26    The Illinois Department may require that all dispensers of   HB3434- 22 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1medical services desiring to participate in the medical 2assistance program established under this Article disclose, 3under such terms and conditions as the Illinois Department may 4by rule establish, all inquiries from clients and attorneys 5regarding medical bills paid by the Illinois Department, which 6inquiries could indicate potential existence of claims or 7liens for the Illinois Department. 8    Enrollment of a vendor shall be subject to a provisional 9period and shall be conditional for one year. During the 10period of conditional enrollment, the Department may terminate 11the vendor's eligibility to participate in, or may disenroll 12the vendor from, the medical assistance program without cause. 13Unless otherwise specified, such termination of eligibility or 14disenrollment is not subject to the Department's hearing 15process. However, a disenrolled vendor may reapply without 16penalty. 17    The Department has the discretion to limit the conditional 18enrollment period for vendors based upon the category of risk 19of the vendor.20    Prior to enrollment and during the conditional enrollment 21period in the medical assistance program, all vendors shall be 22subject to enhanced oversight, screening, and review based on 23the risk of fraud, waste, and abuse that is posed by the 24category of risk of the vendor. The Illinois Department shall 25establish the procedures for oversight, screening, and review, 26which may include, but need not be limited to: criminal and   HB3434- 23 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1financial background checks; fingerprinting; license, 2certification, and authorization verifications; unscheduled or 3unannounced site visits; database checks; prepayment audit 4reviews; audits; payment caps; payment suspensions; and other 5screening as required by federal or State law.6    The Department shall define or specify the following: (i) 7by provider notice, the "category of risk of the vendor" for 8each type of vendor, which shall take into account the level of 9screening applicable to a particular category of vendor under 10federal law and regulations; (ii) by rule or provider notice, 11the maximum length of the conditional enrollment period for 12each category of risk of the vendor; and (iii) by rule, the 13hearing rights, if any, afforded to a vendor in each category 14of risk of the vendor that is terminated or disenrolled during 15the conditional enrollment period. 16    To be eligible for payment consideration, a vendor's 17payment claim or bill, either as an initial claim or as a 18resubmitted claim following prior rejection, must be received 19by the Illinois Department, or its fiscal intermediary, no 20later than 180 days after the latest date on the claim on which 21medical goods or services were provided, with the following 22exceptions:23        (1) In the case of a provider whose enrollment is in 24    process by the Illinois Department, the 180-day period 25    shall not begin until the date on the written notice from 26    the Illinois Department that the provider enrollment is   HB3434- 24 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1    complete.2        (2) In the case of errors attributable to the Illinois 3    Department or any of its claims processing intermediaries 4    which result in an inability to receive, process, or 5    adjudicate a claim, the 180-day period shall not begin 6    until the provider has been notified of the error.7        (3) In the case of a provider for whom the Illinois 8    Department initiates the monthly billing process.9        (4) In the case of a provider operated by a unit of 10    local government with a population exceeding 3,000,000 11    when local government funds finance federal participation 12    for claims payments. 13    For claims for services rendered during a period for which 14a recipient received retroactive eligibility, claims must be 15filed within 180 days after the Department determines the 16applicant is eligible. For claims for which the Illinois 17Department is not the primary payer, claims must be submitted 18to the Illinois Department within 180 days after the final 19adjudication by the primary payer.20    In the case of long term care facilities, within 120 21calendar days of receipt by the facility of required 22prescreening information, new admissions with associated 23admission documents shall be submitted through the Medical 24Electronic Data Interchange (MEDI) or the Recipient 25Eligibility Verification (REV) System or shall be submitted 26directly to the Department of Human Services using required   HB3434- 25 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1admission forms. Effective September 1, 2014, admission 2documents, including all prescreening information, must be 3submitted through MEDI or REV. Confirmation numbers assigned 4to an accepted transaction shall be retained by a facility to 5verify timely submittal. Once an admission transaction has 6been completed, all resubmitted claims following prior 7rejection are subject to receipt no later than 180 days after 8the admission transaction has been completed.9    Claims that are not submitted and received in compliance 10with the foregoing requirements shall not be eligible for 11payment under the medical assistance program, and the State 12shall have no liability for payment of those claims.13    To the extent consistent with applicable information and 14privacy, security, and disclosure laws, State and federal 15agencies and departments shall provide the Illinois Department 16access to confidential and other information and data 17necessary to perform eligibility and payment verifications and 18other Illinois Department functions. This includes, but is not 19limited to: information pertaining to licensure; 20certification; earnings; immigration status; citizenship; wage 21reporting; unearned and earned income; pension income; 22employment; supplemental security income; social security 23numbers; National Provider Identifier (NPI) numbers; the 24National Practitioner Data Bank (NPDB); program and agency 25exclusions; taxpayer identification numbers; tax delinquency; 26corporate information; and death records.  HB3434- 26 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1    The Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with 2State agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter 3into agreements with federal agencies and departments, under 4which such agencies and departments shall share data necessary 5for medical assistance program integrity functions and 6oversight. The Illinois Department shall develop, in 7cooperation with other State departments and agencies, and in 8compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 9appropriate and effective methods to share such data. At a 10minimum, and to the extent necessary to provide data sharing, 11the Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with State 12agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter into 13agreements with federal agencies and departments, including, 14but not limited to: the Secretary of State; the Department of 15Revenue; the Department of Public Health; the Department of 16Human Services; and the Department of Financial and 17Professional Regulation.18    Beginning in fiscal year 2013, the Illinois Department 19shall set forth a request for information to identify the 20benefits of a pre-payment, post-adjudication, and post-edit 21claims system with the goals of streamlining claims processing 22and provider reimbursement, reducing the number of pending or 23rejected claims, and helping to ensure a more transparent 24adjudication process through the utilization of: (i) provider 25data verification and provider screening technology; and (ii) 26clinical code editing; and (iii) pre-pay, pre-adjudicated, or   HB3434- 27 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1post-adjudicated predictive modeling with an integrated case 2management system with link analysis. Such a request for 3information shall not be considered as a request for proposal 4or as an obligation on the part of the Illinois Department to 5take any action or acquire any products or services. 6    The Illinois Department shall establish policies, 7procedures, standards and criteria by rule for the 8acquisition, repair and replacement of orthotic and prosthetic 9devices and durable medical equipment. Such rules shall 10provide, but not be limited to, the following services: (1) 11immediate repair or replacement of such devices by recipients; 12and (2) rental, lease, purchase or lease-purchase of durable 13medical equipment in a cost-effective manner, taking into 14consideration the recipient's medical prognosis, the extent of 15the recipient's needs, and the requirements and costs for 16maintaining such equipment. Subject to prior approval, such 17rules shall enable a recipient to temporarily acquire and use 18alternative or substitute devices or equipment pending repairs 19or replacements of any device or equipment previously 20authorized for such recipient by the Department. 21Notwithstanding any provision of Section 5-5f to the contrary, 22the Department may, by rule, exempt certain replacement 23wheelchair parts from prior approval and, for wheelchairs, 24wheelchair parts, wheelchair accessories, and related seating 25and positioning items, determine the wholesale price by 26methods other than actual acquisition costs.  HB3434- 28 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1    The Department shall require, by rule, all providers of 2durable medical equipment to be accredited by an accreditation 3organization approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and 4Medicaid Services and recognized by the Department in order to 5bill the Department for providing durable medical equipment to 6recipients. No later than 15 months after the effective date 7of the rule adopted pursuant to this paragraph, all providers 8must meet the accreditation requirement.9    In order to promote environmental responsibility, meet the 10needs of recipients and enrollees, and achieve significant 11cost savings, the Department, or a managed care organization 12under contract with the Department, may provide recipients or 13managed care enrollees who have a prescription or Certificate 14of Medical Necessity access to refurbished durable medical 15equipment under this Section (excluding prosthetic and 16orthotic devices as defined in the Orthotics, Prosthetics, and 17Pedorthics Practice Act and complex rehabilitation technology 18products and associated services) through the State's 19assistive technology program's reutilization program, using 20staff with the Assistive Technology Professional (ATP) 21Certification if the refurbished durable medical equipment: 22(i) is available; (ii) is less expensive, including shipping 23costs, than new durable medical equipment of the same type; 24(iii) is able to withstand at least 3 years of use; (iv) is 25cleaned, disinfected, sterilized, and safe in accordance with 26federal Food and Drug Administration regulations and guidance   HB3434- 29 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1governing the reprocessing of medical devices in health care 2settings; and (v) equally meets the needs of the recipient or 3enrollee. The reutilization program shall confirm that the 4recipient or enrollee is not already in receipt of the same or 5similar equipment from another service provider, and that the 6refurbished durable medical equipment equally meets the needs 7of the recipient or enrollee. Nothing in this paragraph shall 8be construed to limit recipient or enrollee choice to obtain 9new durable medical equipment or place any additional prior 10authorization conditions on enrollees of managed care 11organizations. 12    The Department shall execute, relative to the nursing home 13prescreening project, written inter-agency agreements with the 14Department of Human Services and the Department on Aging, to 15effect the following: (i) intake procedures and common 16eligibility criteria for those persons who are receiving 17non-institutional services; and (ii) the establishment and 18development of non-institutional services in areas of the 19State where they are not currently available or are 20undeveloped; and (iii) notwithstanding any other provision of 21law, subject to federal approval, on and after July 1, 2012, an 22increase in the determination of need (DON) scores from 29 to 2337 for applicants for institutional and home and 24community-based long term care; if and only if federal 25approval is not granted, the Department may, in conjunction 26with other affected agencies, implement utilization controls   HB3434- 30 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1or changes in benefit packages to effectuate a similar savings 2amount for this population; and (iv) no later than July 1, 32013, minimum level of care eligibility criteria for 4institutional and home and community-based long term care; and 5(v) no later than October 1, 2013, establish procedures to 6permit long term care providers access to eligibility scores 7for individuals with an admission date who are seeking or 8receiving services from the long term care provider. In order 9to select the minimum level of care eligibility criteria, the 10Governor shall establish a workgroup that includes affected 11agency representatives and stakeholders representing the 12institutional and home and community-based long term care 13interests. This Section shall not restrict the Department from 14implementing lower level of care eligibility criteria for 15community-based services in circumstances where federal 16approval has been granted. 17    The Illinois Department shall develop and operate, in 18cooperation with other State Departments and agencies and in 19compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 20appropriate and effective systems of health care evaluation 21and programs for monitoring of utilization of health care 22services and facilities, as it affects persons eligible for 23medical assistance under this Code. 24    The Illinois Department shall report annually to the 25General Assembly, no later than the second Friday in April of 261979 and each year thereafter, in regard to:   HB3434- 31 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1        (a) actual statistics and trends in utilization of 2    medical services by public aid recipients; 3        (b) actual statistics and trends in the provision of 4    the various medical services by medical vendors; 5        (c) current rate structures and proposed changes in 6    those rate structures for the various medical vendors; and 7        (d) efforts at utilization review and control by the 8    Illinois Department. 9    The period covered by each report shall be the 3 years 10ending on the June 30 prior to the report. The report shall 11include suggested legislation for consideration by the General 12Assembly. The requirement for reporting to the General 13Assembly shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as 14required by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization 15Act, and filing such additional copies with the State 16Government Report Distribution Center for the General Assembly 17as is required under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State 18Library Act. 19    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 20any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 21with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 22Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 23Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 24whatever reason, is unauthorized. 25    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 26rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter   HB3434- 32 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 2of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 3with Section 5-5e. 4    Because kidney transplantation can be an appropriate, 5cost-effective alternative to renal dialysis when medically 6necessary and notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1-11 7of this Code, beginning October 1, 2014, the Department shall 8cover kidney transplantation for noncitizens with end-stage 9renal disease who are not eligible for comprehensive medical 10benefits, who meet the residency requirements of Section 5-3 11of this Code, and who would otherwise meet the financial 12requirements of the appropriate class of eligible persons 13under Section 5-2 of this Code. To qualify for coverage of 14kidney transplantation, such person must be receiving 15emergency renal dialysis services covered by the Department. 16Providers under this Section shall be prior approved and 17certified by the Department to perform kidney transplantation 18and the services under this Section shall be limited to 19services associated with kidney transplantation. 20    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to the 21contrary, on or after July 1, 2015, all FDA-approved FDA 22approved forms of medication assisted treatment prescribed for 23the treatment of alcohol dependence or treatment of opioid 24dependence shall be covered under both fee-for-service and 25managed care medical assistance programs for persons who are 26otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article   HB3434- 33 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1and shall not be subject to any (1) utilization control, other 2than those established under the American Society of Addiction 3Medicine patient placement criteria, (2) prior authorization 4mandate, (3) lifetime restriction limit mandate, or (4) 5limitations on dosage. 6    On or after July 1, 2015, opioid antagonists prescribed 7for the treatment of an opioid overdose, including the 8medication product, administration devices, and any pharmacy 9fees or hospital fees related to the dispensing, distribution, 10and administration of the opioid antagonist, shall be covered 11under the medical assistance program for persons who are 12otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 13As used in this Section, "opioid antagonist" means a drug that 14binds to opioid receptors and blocks or inhibits the effect of 15opioids acting on those receptors, including, but not limited 16to, naloxone hydrochloride or any other similarly acting drug 17approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. The 18Department shall not impose a copayment on the coverage 19provided for naloxone hydrochloride under the medical 20assistance program.21    Upon federal approval, the Department shall provide 22coverage and reimbursement for all drugs that are approved for 23marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration and that 24are recommended by the federal Public Health Service or the 25United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention for 26pre-exposure prophylaxis and related pre-exposure prophylaxis   HB3434- 34 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1services, including, but not limited to, HIV and sexually 2transmitted infection screening, treatment for sexually 3transmitted infections, medical monitoring, assorted labs, and 4counseling to reduce the likelihood of HIV infection among 5individuals who are not infected with HIV but who are at high 6risk of HIV infection.7    A federally qualified health center, as defined in Section 81905(l)(2)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, shall be 9reimbursed by the Department in accordance with the federally 10qualified health center's encounter rate for services provided 11to medical assistance recipients that are performed by a 12dental hygienist, as defined under the Illinois Dental 13Practice Act, working under the general supervision of a 14dentist and employed by a federally qualified health center. 15    Within 90 days after October 8, 2021 (the effective date 16of Public Act 102-665), the Department shall seek federal 17approval of a State Plan amendment to expand coverage for 18family planning services that includes presumptive eligibility 19to individuals whose income is at or below 208% of the federal 20poverty level. Coverage under this Section shall be effective 21beginning no later than December 1, 2022.22    Subject to approval by the federal Centers for Medicare 23and Medicaid Services of a Title XIX State Plan amendment 24electing the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly 25(PACE) as a State Medicaid option, as provided for by Subtitle 26I (commencing with Section 4801) of Title IV of the Balanced   HB3434- 35 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1Budget Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-33) and Part 460 2(commencing with Section 460.2) of Subchapter E of Title 42 of 3the Code of Federal Regulations, PACE program services shall 4become a covered benefit of the medical assistance program, 5subject to criteria established in accordance with all 6applicable laws.7    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 8community-based pediatric palliative care from a trained 9interdisciplinary team shall be covered under the medical 10assistance program as provided in Section 15 of the Pediatric 11Palliative Care Act.12    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, within 1312 months after June 2, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 14102-1037) and subject to federal approval, acupuncture 15services performed by an acupuncturist licensed under the 16Acupuncture Practice Act who is acting within the scope of his 17or her license shall be covered under the medical assistance 18program. The Department shall apply for any federal waiver or 19State Plan amendment, if required, to implement this 20paragraph. The Department may adopt any rules, including 21standards and criteria, necessary to implement this paragraph. 22    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 23medical assistance program shall, subject to federal approval, 24reimburse hospitals for costs associated with a newborn 25screening test for the presence of metachromatic 26leukodystrophy, as required under the Newborn Metabolic   HB3434- 36 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1Screening Act, at a rate not less than the fee charged by the 2Department of Public Health. Notwithstanding any other 3provision of this Code, the medical assistance program shall, 4subject to appropriation and federal approval, also reimburse 5hospitals for costs associated with all newborn screening 6tests added on and after August 9, 2024 (the effective date of 7Public Act 103-909) this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 8Assembly to the Newborn Metabolic Screening Act and required 9to be performed under that Act at a rate not less than the fee 10charged by the Department of Public Health. The Department 11shall seek federal approval before the implementation of the 12newborn screening test fees by the Department of Public 13Health. 14    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 15beginning on January 1, 2024, subject to federal approval, 16cognitive assessment and care planning services provided to a 17person who experiences signs or symptoms of cognitive 18impairment, as defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical 19Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition, shall be covered 20under the medical assistance program for persons who are 21otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 22    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 23medically necessary reconstructive services that are intended 24to restore physical appearance shall be covered under the 25medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 26eligible for medical assistance under this Article. As used in   HB3434- 37 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b1this paragraph, "reconstructive services" means treatments 2performed on structures of the body damaged by trauma to 3restore physical appearance. 4    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, within 512 months after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 6the 104th General Assembly, subject to federal approval, 7nutrition care services and medical nutrition therapy provided 8by a registered dietitian licensed under the Dietitian 9Nutritionist Practice Act who is acting within the scope of 10his or her license shall be covered under the medical 11assistance program. Services covered under this paragraph may 12be aimed at prevention, delay, management, treatment, or 13rehabilitation of a disease or condition and include, as 14defined in Section 10 of the Dietitian Nutritionist Practice 15Act, nutrition assessment, nutrition intervention, nutrition 16counseling, and nutrition monitoring and evaluation. The 17Department shall submit a Title XIX State Plan amendment, if 18required, to implement this paragraph. The Department shall 19adopt rules to implement this paragraph, including rules that 20ensure coverage for individuals with chronic conditions 21without prior authorization. 22(Source: P.A. 102-43, Article 30, Section 30-5, eff. 7-6-21; 23102-43, Article 35, Section 35-5, eff. 7-6-21; 102-43, Article 2455, Section 55-5, eff. 7-6-21; 102-95, eff. 1-1-22; 102-123, 25eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-598, eff. 1-1-22; 26102-655, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-813, eff.   HB3434- 38 -LRB104 10161 KTG 20233 b15-13-22; 102-1018, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1037, eff. 6-2-22; 2102-1038, eff. 1-1-23; 103-102, Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 31-1-24; 103-102, Article 95, Section 95-15, eff. 1-1-24; 4103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-368, eff. 51-1-24; 103-593, Article 5, Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, 6Article 90, Section 90-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 7103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-909, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1040, eff. 88-9-24; revised 10-10-24.)